Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,247
Trucks and buses; brake requirements; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate or cause to be operated on the highways in the State of Nebraska buses or trucks having a gross weight of the truck and load exceeding twelve thousand pounds unless such bus or truck is equipped with power brakes, auxiliary brakes, or some standard booster brake equipment. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1935, c. 134, § 10, p. 489;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-11,106;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,113;

Laws 1974, LB 593, § 8;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,161;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 343;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 206;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 80.

In order to constitute evidence of negligence, failure to have auxiliary brake equipment must have some causal relation between violation of this section and an accident. Herman v. Firestine, 146 Neb. 730, 21 N.W.2d 444 (1946).

When petition charges negligence in that defendant failed to have truck equipped with proper brakes, the evidence must sustain such allegations. Knoche v. Pease Grain & Seed Co., 134 Neb. 130, 277 N.W. 798 (1938).